Utah statutes.
20A-3-404.5.   Special overseas citizen voter absentee ballot.
(1)  As used in this section, "federal office" means President/Vice President
of the United States, United States Senator, and United States Representative.
(2)  Each county clerk, after consulting with the chief election officer,
shall prepare a special overseas citizen voter ballot containing a means for
the overseas citizen voter to vote for each federal office that will appear on
the regular general election ballot.
